District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.29

Repealed

Voting of shares — By certain holders; proxy presumed valid.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 192, ch. 269, § 29
July 23, 1959, 73 Stat. 240, Pub. L. 86-106, § 6
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.29.
1981 Ed., § 29-329.
1973 Ed., § 29-913.